Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202649-1461
Ballot question committee; campaign statement; filing dates; certification by committee's treasurer; required.

(1) In addition to the campaign statements required to be filed pursuant to sections 49-1459 and 49-1462, a ballot question committee shall file a campaign statement as required by the Nebraska Political Accountability and Disclosure Act according to the following schedule:

(a) The first campaign statement shall be filed within ten days after the end of the calendar month in which the petition form is filed with the Secretary of State pursuant to section 32-1405. The closing date for the campaign statement shall be the last day of such calendar month;

(b) Additional campaign statements shall be filed within ten days after the end of each calendar month thereafter except for the calendar month during which the signed petitions must be filed with the Secretary of State as provided in section 32-1407. The closing date for such campaign statements shall be the last day of each such calendar month; and

(c) A final campaign statement shall be filed not later than thirty days after the deadline for filing petitions with the Secretary of State as provided in section 32-1407. The closing date for the campaign statement shall be twenty-five days after the deadline for filing such petitions.

(2) Any campaign statement filed by a ballot question committee pursuant to this section or section 49-1459 or 49-1462 shall include a certification by the committee's treasurer affirming that, to the best of the treasurer's knowledge, the donor associated with each contribution is not a foreign national and has not intentionally received, solicited, or accepted, whether directly or indirectly, contributions or expenditures aggregating in excess of one hundred thousand dollars from one or more foreign nationals within the four-year period immediately preceding the date of the contribution.

(3) The campaign statements required to be filed pursuant to this section shall be filed whether or not petitions have or will be filed with the Secretary of State. Any person who fails to file a campaign statement with the commission pursuant to this section shall be subject to late filing fees as provided in section 49-1463.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 61;

Laws 1980, LB 535, § 12;

Laws 1989, LB 637, § 4;

Laws 1991, LB 534, § 2;

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 568;

Laws 2024, LB1070, § 1;

Laws 2026, LB1075, § 54.
July 18, 2026